src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_oitte_haravoita_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - haravoita - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     haravoita+V+Inf: haravoita
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haravoitten
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: haravoittet
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haravoittee
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: haravoittema
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: haravoittetta
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: haravoithaan
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: haravoittin
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: haravoittit
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: haravoitti
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: haravoittima
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: haravoittitta
     haravoita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: haravoithiin
     haravoita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoinu
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoittu
     haravoita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoinheet
     haravoita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoiva
     haravoita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoivat
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: haravoittava
     haravoita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: haravoittavat

     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: haravoittisin
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: haravoittisit
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: haravoittis
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: haravoittisimma
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: haravoittisitta
     haravoita+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: haravoittais
     haravoita+V+Pass+Cond: haravoittais

     haravoita+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: haravoitte
     haravoita+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: haravoikkaa
     
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: haravoittemassa
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: haravoittemasta
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: haravoittemhaan
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: haravoittemalla
     haravoita+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: haravoittematta
